Maryland, session 2025, SB0525.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
10–110.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
– 1 –

Ch. 181 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) “Litter” means all rubbish, waste matter, refuse, garbage, trash, debris,
dead animals, or other discarded materials of every kind and description.
(c) A person may not:
(1) dispose of litter on a highway or perform an act that violates the State
Vehicle Laws regarding disposal of litter, glass, and other prohibited substances on
highways; or
(2) dispose or cause or allow the disposal of litter on public or private
property unless:
(i) the property is designated by the State, a unit of the State, or a
political subdivision of the State for the disposal of litter and the person is authorized by
the proper public authority to use the property; or
(ii) the litter is placed into a litter receptacle or container installed
on the property.
(f) (1) A person who violates this section is subject to the penalties provided
in this subsection.
(2) (i) A person who disposes of litter in violation of this section in an
amount not exceeding 100 pounds or 27 cubic feet and not for commercial gain is guilty of
a misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 30 days or a
fine not exceeding $1,500 or both.
(ii) A person who disposes of litter in violation of this section in an
amount exceeding 100 pounds or 27 cubic feet, but not exceeding 500 pounds or 216 cubic
feet, and not for commercial gain is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to
imprisonment not exceeding 1 year or a fine not exceeding $12,500 or both.
(iii) A person who disposes of litter in violation of this section in an
amount exceeding 500 pounds or 216 cubic feet or in any amount for commercial gain is
guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 5 years
or a fine not exceeding $30,000 or both.
(h) A unit that supervises State property shall:
(1) establish and maintain receptacles for the disposal of litter at
appropriate locations where the public frequents the property;
(2) post signs directing persons to the receptacles and serving notice of the
provisions of this section; and
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 181
(3) otherwise publicize the availability of litter receptacles and the
requirements of this section.
(i) (1) Fines collected for violations of this section shall be disbursed:
(i) to the county or municipal corporation where the violation
occurred; or
(ii) if the bi–county unit is the enforcement unit and the violations
occurred on property over which the bi–county unit exercises jurisdiction, to the bi–county
unit.
(2) (I) Fines EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, FINES collected shall be used to pay for:
(I) litter receptacles and posting signs as required by subsection (h)
of this section and for other purposes relating to the removal or control of litter; AND.
(II) FINES COLLECTED IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY SHALL BE
USED TO PAY FOR:
1. MAINTENANCE COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE PILOT
PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (K) OF THIS SECTION;
2. LITTER RECEPTACLES AND POSTING SIGNS THAT ARE
REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (H) OF THIS SECTION AND FOR OTHER PURPOSES
RELATED TO THE REMOVAL OR CONTROL OF LITTER;
3. THE REMOVAL OR CONTROL OF LITTER, LITTER
REMOVAL PROGRAMS, OVERSIGHT, AND OPERATIONS PERFORMED BY THE UNIT
THAT SUPERVISES STATE PROPERTY; AND
4. REWARDS TO MEMBERS OF THE PUBLIC WHO SUBMIT
VIDEO EVIDENCE THROUGH A PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (K) OF
THIS SECTION.
(K) (1) EACH COUNTY SHALL THE GOVERNING BODY FOR PRINCE
GEORGE’S COUNTY MAY ESTABLISH A PILOT PROGRAM ALLOWING A MEMBER OF
THE PUBLIC TO:
(1) (I) SUBMIT VIDEO EVIDENCE OF AN ALLEGED VIOLATION OF
THIS SECTION OCCURRING IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY TO AN ENFORCEMENT
UNIT WITH JURISDICTION; AND
– 3 –

Ch. 181 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) RECEIVE “HALF THE TOTAL AMOUNT” OF ANY FINES COLLECTED
(II) RECEIVE HALF THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF ANY FINES
COLLECTED IN RELATION TO THE VIOLATION IF THE VIDEO EVIDENCE LEADS TO A
CONVICTION UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) IF A PERSON FINED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT PAY THE
FINE, THE COURT GOVERNING BODY OF PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY MAY REFER THE
AMOUNT OF THE UNPAID OUTSTANDING FINE TO THE CENTRAL COLLECTION UNIT
OF THE DEPARTMENT OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT.
[(k)] (L) This section may be cited as the “Illegal Dumping and Litter Control
Law”.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025. This Act shall remain effective for a period of 5 years and, at the end of
September 30, 2030, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly,
shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 4 –